Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1302
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1303 to 38-1306 apply.

Laws 1963, c. 400, § 2, p. 1279;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 27;

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 38;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 666;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 116;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3702;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 578;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 523.